Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-277
Hearing; rules of evidence or courtroom procedures; not applicable.

In conducting the hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269, the hearing examiner shall not be bound by the rules of evidence or any other courtroom procedure.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,190;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 81.